Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.110

Penalty for concealing or destroying evidence.

Every board trustee or director, officer, employee, or agent of any savings bank or its holding company who for the purpose of concealing any fact suppresses any evidence against himself or herself, or against any other person, or who abstracts, removes, mutilates, destroys, or secretes any paper, book, or record of any savings bank or its holding company, or of the director, or anyone connected with his or her office is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2010 c 88 s 42; 2003 c 53 s 195; 1994 c 92 s 299; 1955 c 13 s 32.04.110. Prior: 1931 c 132 s 12; RRS s 3379c.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.